Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-910
Pretrial release agency; designation; order; contents.

In the event the district court shall designate an official pretrial release agency, an order designating such agency shall be filed with the clerk of each district court in such district and shall affect all courts within such district. The order shall set out the name of the agency, its sponsoring agencies, if any, and the terms and conditions under which such agency shall operate.

Laws 1971, LB 412, § 2;

Laws 1972, LB 1249, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 59.